Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201683-1,135.05
Rules and regulations; inmate outside correctional facility.

The Department of Correctional Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act regarding any procedures or policies used by the department for any situation where an inmate, under the authority of the department, is outside a correctional facility operated by the department or a contract facility as defined in section 83-1,119 unless the safety and security of a correctional institution would be placed at imminent and substantial risk by such publication.

Laws 2016, LB867, § 18.
January 1, 2017
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.